Idaho, session 2025, S1154.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Commission on the Arts an additional
$18,400 from the General Fund to be expended for trustee and benefit payments
for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. FEDERAL FUNDING RESTRICTIONS. Pursuant to Section
67-3511(2), Idaho Code, legislative appropriations shall not be transferred
from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
Appropriations made pursuant to this act contingent on anticipated federal
funding, grants, or programs shall not be supplanted by state funds in the
event of any reduction or elimination of such federal support without Leg-
islative approval. The agency receiving the appropriation shall take all
necessary actions to ensure that the state is not obligated to replace lost
federal funds. Pursuant to Section 67-1917, Idaho Code, the agency will
submit an inventory of federal funds utilized by the agency. State funds ap-
propriated to satisfy match requirements for federal funds shall be reverted
to the maximum extent possible if federal funds requiring match are reduced
or eliminated. The agency shall promptly notify the Budget and Policy Anal-
ysis Division of the Legislative Services Office of any significant changes
related to federal funding, grants, or programs. This does not apply to
standard federal funding adjustments that take place within an agency's cost
allocation plan or indirect expenditure plan for indirect costs and agency
support staff, FMAP adjustments, or entitlement programs.
SECTION 3. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.